California statutes. Public Resources Code
(4) “Agricultural wastes” includes solid wastes of plant and animal origin, which result from the production and processing of farm or agricultural products, including manures, orchard and vineyard prunings, and crop residues, which are removed from the site of generation for solid waste management. Agriculture refers to SIC Codes 011 to 0291, inclusive.

(c) For purposes of determining the base amount of solid waste from which the diversion requirements of this article shall be calculated, “solid waste” does not include the diversion of agricultural wastes; inert solids, including inert solids used for structural fill; discarded, white-coated, major appliances; and scrap metals; unless all of the following criteria are met:

(1) The city, county, or regional agency demonstrates that the material was diverted from a permitted disposal facility through an action by the city, county, or regional agency which specifically resulted in the diversion.

(2) The city, county, or regional agency demonstrates that, prior to January 1, 1990, the solid waste which is claimed to have been diverted was disposed of at a permitted disposal facility in the quantity being claimed as diversion. If historical disposal data is not available, that demonstration may be based upon information available to the city, county, or regional agency which substantiates a reasonable estimate of disposal quantities which is as accurate as is feasible in the absence of historical disposal data.

(3) The city, county, or regional agency is implementing, and will continue to implement, source reduction, recycling, and composting programs, as described in its source reduction and recycling element.

(d) If a city, county, or regional agency source reduction and recycling element submitted pursuant to this chapter includes the diversion of any of the wastes specified in subdivision (c) for years preceding the year commencing January 1, 1990, that diversion shall not apply to the diversion requirements of Section 41780, unless the criteria in subdivision (c) are met.

(e) If a city, county, or regional agency source reduction and recycling element submitted pursuant to this chapter does not contain information sufficient for the city, county, or regional agency to demonstrate to the board whether the criteria in subdivision (c) have been met, the city, county, or regional agency may provide additional information following board review of the source reduction and recycling element pursuant to Section 41791.5. In providing the additional information, Sections 41801.5 and 41811.5 shall apply.

(f) In demonstrating whether the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) have been met, the city, county, or regional agency shall submit information to the board on local government programs which are specifically related to the claimed diversion.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for purposes of determining the base amount of solid waste from which the diversion requirements of this article shall be calculated for a city, county, or regional agency which includes biomass conversion in its source reduction and recycling element pursuant to Section 41783.1, the base amount shall include those materials disposed of in the base year at biomass conversion facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1227, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

41781.3.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the use of solid waste for beneficial reuse in the construction and operation of a solid waste landfill, including use of alternative daily cover, which reduces or eliminates the amount of solid waste being disposed pursuant to Section 40124, shall constitute diversion through recycling and shall not be considered disposal for purposes of this division.

(2) (A) Commencing January 1, 2020, the use of green material as alternative daily cover does not constitute diversion through recycling and shall be considered disposal for purposes of this division.

(B) Commencing January 1, 2020, a local jurisdiction that, as a result of not being able to claim diversion for the use of green material as alternative daily cover, does not meet the requirements of Section 41780 shall, in the next annual report required pursuant to Section 41821, identify and address barriers to recycling green material and, if sufficient capacity at facilities that recycle green material is not expected to be operational before the jurisdiction’s next review pursuant to Section 41825, include a plan to address those barriers that are within the control of the local jurisdiction.

(C) Commencing January 1, 2020, green material used as alternative daily cover at a solid waste landfill is not subject to the fee imposed on disposed solid waste pursuant to Section 48000.

(3) Commencing August 1, 2018, a local jurisdiction shall include in the electronic annual report required pursuant to Section 41821 information on how the local jurisdiction intends to address the requirements of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) and divert green material that is being used as alternative daily cover.

(b) Before December 31, 1997, pursuant to the department’s authority to adopt rules and regulations pursuant to Section 40502, the department shall, by regulation, establish conditions for the use of alternative daily cover that are consistent with this division. In adopting the regulations, the department shall consider, but is
 not limited to consideration of, all of the following criteria:

(1) Those conditions established in past policies adopted by the department affecting the use of alternative daily cover.

(2) Those conditions necessary to provide for the continued economic development, economic viability, and employment opportunities provided by the composting industry in the state.

(3) Those performance standards and limitations on maximum functional thickness necessary to ensure protection of public health and safety consistent with state minimum standards.

(c) Until the adoption of additional regulations, the use of alternative daily cover shall be governed by the
 conditions established by the department in its existing regulations set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of, and paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of, Section 18813 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as those sections read on January 1, 1997, and by the conditions established in the department’s policy adopted on January 25, 1995.

(d) In adopting rules and regulations pursuant to this division, including, but not limited to, Part 2 (commencing with Section 40900), the department shall provide guidance to local enforcement agencies on any conditions and restrictions on the utilization of alternative daily cover so as to ensure proper enforcement of those rules and regulations.

(e) Nothing in this section modifies, limits, or abrogates the authority of a local jurisdiction with respect to land use, zoning, or facility siting decisions within that local jurisdiction.

(f) For purposes of this section, “green material” has the same meaning as “processed green material,” as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 20690 of Title 27 of the California Code of Regulations. The term does not include materials left over from the composting process, materials left over after the material recovery process, commonly referred to as “fines,” or processed construction and demolition waste materials.

(g) For purposes of this section, “processed construction and demolition
 waste material” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 20690 of Title 27 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 719, Sec. 2.   (AB 1594)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

41781.4.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the export of a mixture of plastic wastes shall not constitute diversion through recycling and shall be considered disposal for purposes of this division.

(b) Plastic waste export that is a mixture of plastic wastes shall constitute diversion through recycling and shall not be considered disposal for purposes of this division if it meets both of the following criteria:

(1) The plastic waste export is a mixture of plastic wastes consisting of polyethylene, polypropylene, or polyethylene terephthalate and the export is destined for separate recycling of each material.

(2) The
 plastic waste export is not prohibited by an applicable law or treaty of the country of destination and the import of the plastic waste into the country of destination will be conducted in accordance with all applicable laws and treaties of the country of destination.

(c) For purposes of this section, “export” means export out of the country. Until January 1, 2024, or the expiration of a relevant trade agreement or arrangement with Canada or Mexico, whichever is later, “export” does not include export to Canada or Mexico.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 501, Sec. 1.   (AB 881)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41782.

(a) The board may make adjustments to the amounts reported pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 41821.5, if the city, county, or regional agency demonstrates, and the board concurs, based on substantial evidence in the record, that achievement of the diversion requirements of Section 41780 is not feasible due to either of the following circumstances:

(1) A medical waste treatment facility, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 25025 of the Health and Safety Code, accepts untreated medical waste, which was generated outside of the jurisdiction, for purposes of treatment, and the medical waste, when treated, becomes solid waste.

(2) (A) A regional diversion facility within the jurisdiction accepts material generated outside the jurisdiction and the conversion or processing of that material results in the production of residual solid waste that cannot feasibly be diverted. Any adjustment provided pursuant to this paragraph shall apply only to that portion of the residual solid waste produced as a consequence of processing material that is not subject to the reporting requirements of subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 41821.5 and that cannot feasibly be allocated to the originating jurisdiction.

(B) For purposes of granting the reduction specified in subparagraph (A) and for the purpose of calculating compliance with the diversion requirements of Section 41780, “regional diversion facility” means a facility which meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The facility accepts material for recycling from both within and without the jurisdiction of the city or county within which it is located.

(2) All material accepted by the facility has been source-separated for the purpose of being processed prior to its arrival at the facility.

(3) The residual solid waste generated by the facility is a byproduct of the recycling that takes place at the facility.

(4) The facility is not a solid waste facility or solid waste handling operation pursuant to Section 43020.

(5) The facility contributes to regional efforts to divert solid waste from disposal.

(b) If the board makes an adjustment pursuant to subdivision (a), the annual report required pursuant to Section 41821 by the jurisdiction, within which a medical waste treatment facility or regional diversion facility described in subdivision (a) is located, shall include all of the following information:

(1) The total amount of residual solid waste produced at the facility.

(2) The waste types and amounts in the residual solid waste that cannot feasibly be diverted.

(3) The factors that continue to prevent the waste types from being feasibly diverted.

(4) Any changes since the petition for adjustment was granted or since the last annual report.

(5) The additional efforts undertaken by the jurisdiction to divert the waste produced at the facility.

(c) Based upon the information submitted pursuant to subdivision (b), if the board finds, as part of the biennial review pursuant to Section 41825, that the residual solid waste that previously could not be diverted can now be diverted, the board shall rescind the adjustment commensurate with the amount of diversion of the residual tonnages.

(d) It is not the intent of the Legislature to exempt any solid waste facility or handling operation from periodic tracking and the reporting of disposal tonnages in accordance with the regulations adopted by the board pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 41821.5, or from the permitting requirements pursuant to Section 43020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 665, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

41783.1.

For any city, county, or regional agency source reduction and recycling element submitted to the department after January 1, 1995, the 50 percent diversion requirement specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 41780 may include not more than 10 percent through biomass conversion if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The biomass conversion project exclusively processes biomass.

(b) The biomass conversion project is in compliance with all applicable air quality laws, rules, and regulations.

(c) The ash or other residue
 from the biomass conversion project is regularly tested to determine if it is hazardous waste and, if it is determined to be hazardous waste, the ash or other residue is sent to a class 1 hazardous waste disposal facility.

(d) The department determines, at a public hearing, based upon substantial evidence in the record, that the city, county, or regional agency is, and will continue to be, effectively implementing all feasible source reduction, recycling, and composting measures.

(e) The city, county, or regional agency does not include transformation in its source reduction and recycling element.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 342, Sec. 4.   (AB 1857)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Rural Assistance [41787. - 41787.5.]

41787.

(a) (1) The board may reduce the diversion requirements of Section 41780 for a rural city if the rural city demonstrates, and the board concurs, based on substantial evidence in the record, that achievement of the diversion requirements is not feasible due to both of the following conditions:

(A) The small geographic size or low population density of the rural city.

(B) The small quantity of solid waste generated within the rural city.

(2) The board may reduce the diversion requirements of Section 41780 for the unincorporated area of a rural county if the rural county demonstrates, and the board concurs, based on substantial evidence in the record, that achievement of the diversion requirements is not feasible due to both of the following conditions:

(A) The large geographic size or low population density of the rural county.

(B) The small quantity of solid waste generated within the rural county.

(3) The board may grant a reduction in diversion requirements pursuant to this subdivision only if the rural city or the rural county demonstrates to the board, and the board concurs, based on substantial evidence in the record, that it has, at a minimum, implemented all of the following programs:

(A) A source reduction and recycling program designed to handle the predominant classes and types of solid waste generated within the rural city or rural county.

(B) A public sector diversion and procurement program.

(C) A public information and education program.

(b) If, as part of the review performed pursuant to Section 41825, the board finds that a rural city or a rural county, which previously qualified for a reduction in diversion requirements pursuant to subdivision (a), is no longer eligible for that reduction, the board shall issue an order requiring the rural city or rural county to comply with the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1227, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

41787.1.

(a) Rural cities and rural counties may join to form rural regional agencies pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 40970) of Chapter 1.

(b) A rural regional agency, and not the rural cities or rural counties which are member jurisdictions of the rural regional agency, may be responsible for compliance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 41780) of Chapter 6 if specified in the agreement pursuant to which the rural regional agency is formed.

(c) (1) The board may reduce the diversion requirements of Section 41780 for a rural regional agency, if the rural regional agency demonstrates, and the board concurs, based on substantial evidence in the record, that achievement of the diversion requirements is not feasible because adverse market or economic conditions beyond the control of the rural regional agency prevent it from meeting the requirements of Section 41780.

(2) Before a rural regional agency may be granted a reduction in diversion requirements pursuant to paragraph (1), it shall demonstrate that, at a minimum, it has established all of the following regionwide programs:

(A) A source reduction and recycling program or programs designed to handle the predominant classes and types of solid waste generated within the rural regional agency.

(B) A regional diversion and procurement program or programs.

(C) A regional public information and education program or programs.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding Section 40974, any civil penalty imposed on a rural regional agency by the board pursuant to Section 41813 or 41850 shall be imposed only on a member rural city or county that is in violation of this division as a city or county irrespective of its membership in the rural regional agency. If a rural regional agency elects to apportion penalties pursuant to this subdivision, the member jurisdiction to that rural regional agency shall, as a condition of the agreement establishing the rural regional agency, be required to account on an individual jurisdictional basis for their compliance with the diversion requirements of Section 41780, as prescribed by Section 41780.2.

(2) In determining whether to impose a penalty on a member of a rural regional agency pursuant to this subdivision, the board may consider all of the following:

(A) The relevant circumstances that resulted in the agency’s failure to achieve the diversion requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 41780, and whether the member contributed to the circumstances that resulted in the failure to achieve the diversion requirements.

(B) Whether the agency’s joint powers agreement specifies that all liability for fines and penalties rests with the member, with no liability assigned to the agency.

(C) Whether the imposition of penalties on members and not on the agency would provide for flexibility that would allow the agency to resolve the problem that is preventing the members from meeting the diversion requirements.

(D) Limiting penalties to a maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day if a member’s failure does not cause other members or the agency to fail to implement programs in the agency’s source reduction and recycling element.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 21, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

41787.2.

(a) A rural city or a rural county, which has received, or is eligible for, a reduction in diversion requirements pursuant to Section 41787, may become a member of a rural regional agency for the purpose of complying with the diversion requirements of Section 41780, in which case the region’s maximum disposal tonnage allowable shall be calculated as follows:

(1) Determining the regional maximum disposal tonnage allowable, excluding members with reduced diversion requirements.

(2) Determining the maximum disposal tonnage allowable for those members authorized to meet reduced diversion requirements.

(3) Adding the calculated maximum disposal tonnages determined pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) to determine the regional maximum disposal tonnage allowable.

(b) (1) A rural regional agency may not assume responsibility for compliance with diversion requirements upon formation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 41787.1, and for compliance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 41780), if the rural regional agency is comprised of more than two rural counties, unless authorized by the board pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) The board may authorize the assumption of responsibility for compliance with diversion requirements by a rural regional agency upon formation, which is comprised of more than two rural counties, if the board finds that the rural regional agency’s assumption of responsibility will not adversely affect compliance with this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1227, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

41787.3.

The board, in consultation with rural cities and rural counties, shall develop model programs and materials to assist rural cities and rural counties in complying with the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 41000) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 41300). Those model programs and materials shall be designed to assist rural cities and rural counties in achieving the purposes of this division in a manner which minimizes, to the maximum extent feasible, the costs imposed on rural cities and rural counties to comply with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1227, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

41787.4.

Notwithstanding Section 41820, the board may grant a two-year time extension from the diversion requirements of Section 41780 to a rural city, rural county, or rural regional agency if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The board adopts written findings, based on substantial evidence in the record, that adverse market or economic conditions beyond the control of the rural city, rural county, or rural regional agency prevent the rural city, rural county, or rural regional agency from meeting the diversion requirements.

(b) The rural city, rural county, or rural regional agency submits a plan of correction that demonstrates how it will meet the diversion requirements before the time extension expires, which includes the source reduction, recycling, and composting programs it will implement and states how those programs will be funded.

(c) The rural city, rural county, or rural regional agency demonstrates that it is achieving the maximum feasible amount of source reduction, recycling, or composting of solid waste within its jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1227, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

41787.5.

Unless in conflict with the express provisions of this article, all other provisions of this division, as appropriate, shall apply to rural cities, rural counties, and rural regional agencies to the same extent that those provisions apply to nonrural cities, counties, and regional agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1227, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Board Review [41790. - 41794.]

41790.

In order to coordinate solid waste management activities throughout the state and to ensure that Article 2 (commencing with Section 40050) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 is implemented, the board shall review each county and city source reduction and recycling element and each countywide integrated waste management plan adopted pursuant to this part to determine if it complies with Article 2 (commencing with Section 40050) of Chapter 1 of Part 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41791.

(a) If any city or county has less than eight years of remaining disposal site capacity, the countywide integrated waste management plan shall be submitted to the board within 12 months after the Office of Administrative Law formally approves regulations for the preparation of countywide siting elements and countywide integrated waste management plans pursuant to Section 11349.3 of the Government Code.

(b) If any city or county has eight or more years of remaining disposal site capacity, the countywide integrated waste management plan shall be submitted to the board within 18 months after the Office of Administrative Law formally approves regulations for the preparation of countywide siting elements and countywide integrated waste management plans pursuant to Section 11349.3 of the Government Code.

(c) A regional agency integrated waste management plan shall be submitted to the board within 18 months after the Office of Administrative Law formally approves regulations for the preparation of countywide siting elements and countywide integrated waste management plans pursuant to Section 11349.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41791.1.

In reviewing, commenting upon, and approving or disapproving integrated waste management plans and the elements thereof, the board shall take into account both of the following:

(a) The shared responsibility which exists under law between the board and local agencies for activities such as the development of markets for materials diverted from disposal facilities, public education and information, and source reduction.

(b) The importance of promoting regional cooperation among local agencies, and cooperation between local agencies and the board in achieving the objectives of this division, to the extent that cooperation will result in more cost-effective and efficient implementation of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41791.2.

In reviewing, commenting upon, and approving or disapproving integrated waste management plans and the elements thereof, the board shall assist local agencies, to the extent that local agencies request this assistance within the same region, in developing regional cooperative approaches to source reduction, public information and education, and market development, if the approaches result in more efficient and cost-effective implementation of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41791.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 41791, and except as provided in subdivision (b), each city, county, and regional agency shall submit its source reduction and recycling element and its nondisposal facility element to the board in accordance with the following schedule:

(A) For any jurisdiction with less than eight years of remaining disposal site capacity, the source reduction and recycling element and the nondisposal facility element shall be submitted on or before April 30, 1994.

(B) For any jurisdiction with eight or more years, but less than 15 years, of remaining disposal site capacity, the source reduction and recycling element and the nondisposal facility element shall be submitted on or before August 31, 1994.

(C) For any jurisdiction with 15 or more years of remaining disposal site capacity, the source reduction and recycling element and the nondisposal facility element shall be submitted on or before December 31, 1994.

(2) For purposes of this section, “remaining disposal site capacity” means capacity remaining as of January 1, 1990. For each jurisdiction, disposal site capacity shall be deemed to be the countywide permitted disposal site capacity.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 41791, a county or regional agency that has adopted a countywide or regional agency integrated waste management plan may submit the plan and its elements to the board for review and approval pursuant to the schedule set forth in paragraph (1).

(b) A city which is incorporated after January 1, 1990, shall submit a source reduction and recycling element, a household hazardous waste element, and a nondisposal facility element to the board for approval within 18 months from the date that the city was incorporated or within 18 months of the effective date of this section, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1150, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

41792.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this part, that cities and counties shall commence efforts to implement source reduction, recycling, or composting activities immediately upon enactment of this part, in order to achieve the deadlines specified under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41793.

Each county or city shall hold at least one public hearing before approving its source reduction and recycling element, household hazardous waste element, and the countywide integrated waste management plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1406, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

41794.

Any city may submit its city source reduction and recycling element or nondisposal facility element to the board for review before the dates in the schedule in Section 41791.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1169, Sec. 11.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Approval of Local Planning [41800. - 41851.]



  ARTICLE 1. Board Approval [41800. - 41802.]

41800.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), within 120 days from the date of receipt of a countywide or regional integrated waste management plan that the department has determined to be complete, or any element of the plan that the department has determined to be complete, the department shall determine whether the plan or element is in compliance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 40050) of Chapter 1 of Part 1, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 41000), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 41750), and, based upon that determination, the department shall approve, conditionally approve, or disapprove the plan or element.

(b) (1) Within 120 days from the
 date of receipt of a city, county, or regional agency nondisposal facility element that the department has determined to be complete, the department shall determine whether the element that the department has determined to be complete is in compliance with Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 41730) and Article 1 (commencing with Section 41780) of Chapter 6, and, based upon that determination, the department shall approve, conditionally approve, or disapprove the element within that time period.

(2) In reviewing the element, the department shall:

(A) Not consider the estimated capacity of the facility or facilities in the element unless the department determines that this information is needed to determine whether the element meets the requirements of Article 1 (commencing with Section 41780) of Chapter 6.

(B) Recognize that individual facilities represent portions of local plans or programs that are designed to achieve the diversion requirements of Section 41780 and therefore may not arbitrarily require new or expanded diversion at proposed facilities.

(C) Not disapprove an element that includes a transfer station or other facility solely because the facility does not contribute toward the jurisdiction’s efforts to comply with Section 41780.

(c) If the department does not act to approve, conditionally approve, or disapprove an element that the department has determined to be complete within 120 days, the department shall be deemed to have approved the element.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 476, Sec. 11.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

41801.

Before approving or conditionally approving a countywide or regional integrated waste management plan, or any element of the plan, pursuant to Section 41800, the board shall adopt written findings, based on substantial evidence in the record, that implementing the plan or element will achieve the requirements established pursuant to this part, including the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1227, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

41801.5.

(a) If an element submitted to the board for final review includes the diversion of any solid wastes specified in subdivision (c) of Section 41781.2 for years preceding the year commencing January 1, 1990, and the board is unable to determine whether the requirements of Section 41781.2 have been met, the board shall notify the city, county, or regional agency that the diversion is excluded for purposes of calculating compliance with Section 41780. The board shall notify the city, county, or regional agency of the exclusion within 60 days from the date of receipt of the element for final review. If an element has been submitted to the board for final review prior to January 1, 1993, the board shall notify the submitting city, county, or regional agency of the exclusion on or before March 1, 1993.

(b) The notice shall be based upon a summary review undertaken solely for the purpose of determining whether the source reduction and recycling element includes any diversion of wastes excluded by Section 41781.2, and whether the element contains information sufficient for the board to determine whether the requirements of that section have been met. The summary review and notice shall be undertaken by the board concurrent with the board’s review and approval, conditional approval, or disapproval of source reduction and recycling elements pursuant to Section 41800.

(c) The board shall approve or conditionally approve the source reduction and recycling element, if wastes have been excluded pursuant to Section 41781.2, if the board finds, pursuant to Section 41801, that, notwithstanding that exclusion, the element will achieve the requirements established pursuant to this part, including the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(d) If the source reduction and recycling element is approved or conditionally approved pursuant to this section, the city, county, or regional agency shall revise the element to reflect the excluded wastes and shall submit any such revisions to the board pursuant to Section 41822.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1227, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

41802.

(a) Within 120 days from the date of receipt of a household hazardous waste element, the board shall approve or disapprove the element.

(b) The board shall not disapprove a household hazardous waste element if the local agency preparing the element demonstrates to the board that, in implementing the household hazardous waste element, the local agency will comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) The local agency will use feasible methods to properly reduce, collect, recycle, treat, and dispose of household hazardous waste generated within its jurisdiction.

(2) The local agency will devote reasonable expenditures to the safe reduction, collection, recycling, treatment, and disposal of household hazardous waste, relative to the other expenditures required by this division, and relative to the expenditures for household hazardous waste programs which were awarded grants of funds pursuant to Section 46401 as it read on January 1, 1993.

(3) The local agency will make all reasonable efforts to inform the public of, and to encourage public participation in, the household hazardous waste program.

(4) Regardless of the number of household hazardous waste collection events held each year by a local agency, or the actual number of households served, the collection program is available for use by all households within the jurisdiction of the local agency, and provides a safe alternative for all residents within the jurisdiction of the local agency to properly and safely dispose of household hazardous waste.

(c) (1) In determining whether a local agency meets the conditions for approval of a household hazardous waste element set forth in subdivision (b), the board shall consider the geographic size and population of the city or county and the quantity of household hazardous waste generated within the jurisdiction of the city or county.

(2) The board may provide an exemption from the requirements of subdivision (b) if a city, county, or a regional agency demonstrates, and the board concurs, that compliance with those requirements is not feasible due to the small geographic size of the city, county, or regional agency and the small quantity of solid waste generated within the city, county, or regional agency. The board may establish alternative, but less comprehensive, requirements for those cities, counties, or regional agencies to ensure compliance with this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1038, Sec. 8.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Deficiencies [41810. - 41813.]

41810.

(a) If the board conditionally approves a countywide or regional integrated waste management plan, or any element of the plan, the board shall issue a notice of conditional approval to the city, county, or regional agency which identifies the specific reasons for the conditional approval. The notice of conditional approval shall include specific recommendations on how to correct the remaining deficiencies in the plan or element.

(b) If the board disapproves a countywide or regional integrated waste management plan, or any element of the plan, the board shall issue a notice of deficiency to the city, county, or regional agency which identifies the specific reasons for the disapproval. The notice of deficiency shall include specific recommendations on how to correct the deficiencies in the plan or element.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1227, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

41810.1.

(a) Any city, county, or regional agency which receives a notice of conditional approval for a countywide or regional integrated waste management plan, or any element of the plan, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 41810, shall, within 60 days from the date of receipt of the notice of conditional approval, submit a compliance schedule to the board that demonstrates how the city, county, or regional agency will correct the deficiencies identified in the notice of conditional approval by the earliest feasible date, but in no event shall that correction take longer to make than one year from the date of submission of the compliance schedule.

(b) The board shall approve or disapprove a compliance schedule submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) within 60 days from the date of its receipt of the schedule.

(c) If the board determines, based on substantial evidence in the record, that a city, county, or regional agency is not in compliance with a compliance schedule approved pursuant to subdivision (b), the board may revoke the notice of conditional approval, and shall issue a notice of deficiency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 41810.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that a notice of conditional approval shall provide flexibility for a city, county, or regional agency to make substantial progress towards meeting the requirements of this part while ensuring full compliance with this part at the earliest feasible date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1227, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1995.)